Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1763.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 983c of Title 22, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Gross negligence” means a reckless disregard for the public


safety and the likelihood of recidivism, as established by clear and


convincing evidence;


2. “Heinous subsequent crime” means any offense classified as a


felony involving murder, manslaughter, rape, sexual assault,


aggravated assault, robbery with a dangerous weapon, child abuse, or


any crime resulting in serious bodily injury or death;



Req. No. 2516 Page 1


3. “Judge” means any duly elected or appointed judge of a court


of record in this state exercising criminal jurisdiction;


4. “Light sentence” means a sentence of probation, suspended


sentence, deferred sentence, or incarceration significantly below


the midpoint of the statutory sentencing range for the offense, as


determined by a court of competent jurisdiction in a subsequent


proceeding;


5. “Prosecuting attorney” means any district attorney,


assistant district attorney, or other attorney authorized to


prosecute criminal cases on behalf of the State of Oklahoma or any


political subdivision thereof;


6. “Unreasonably low bail” means the setting of bail in an


amount substantially below what is reasonably necessary to ensure


the defendant’s appearance at trial and to protect public safety,


considering the nature and circumstances of the offense, the weight


of the evidence, the defendant’s criminal history, and other


relevant factors, as determined by a court of competent jurisdiction


in a subsequent proceeding; and


7. “Refusal to prosecute” means the knowing and willful


decision by a prosecuting attorney not to file charges or to dismiss


charges against an individual for a felony offense where probable


cause exists.


B. Notwithstanding any provision of law providing for judicial


or prosecutorial immunity:

Req. No. 2516 Page 2


1. A judge who imposes a light sentence or sets unreasonably


low bail, or a prosecuting attorney who engages in refusal to


prosecute a felony offense, may be held personally liable in a civil


action for damages proximately caused if the individual subsequently


commits a heinous subsequent crime within five (5) years of the


sentencing, bail setting, or refusal to prosecute, and it is proven


by clear and convincing evidence that the light sentence,


unreasonably low bail, or refusal to prosecute constituted gross


negligence;


2. In any such civil action brought by or on behalf of a victim


of the heinous subsequent crime or the victim’s family, qualified


immunity shall not apply, and the judge or prosecuting attorney may


be sued individually for compensatory damages, punitive damages, and


restitution to the victim or the victim’s family for economic and


noneconomic losses proximately caused by the heinous subsequent


crime; and


3. If the gross negligence is proven beyond a reasonable doubt


in a criminal proceeding initiated by the Attorney General, the


judge or prosecuting attorney shall be guilty of a felony,


punishable upon conviction by imprisonment in the custody of the


Department of Corrections for a term equal to not less than one-half


(1/2) the minimum sentence that could have been imposed on the


original offender, or by a fine not exceeding One Hundred Thousand


Dollars ($100,000.00), or by both such imprisonment and fine. The

Req. No. 2516 Page 3


Attorney General shall have exclusive authority to investigate and


prosecute violations under this paragraph.


C. This section shall not apply to:


1. Decisions made in good faith based on credible evidence of


rehabilitation or insufficient proof; or


2. Mandatory minimum sentences or cases where the sentence or


bail was mandated by law.


D. Any action under this section must be commenced within three


(3) years after the commission of the heinous subsequent crime.


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2516 CN 1/14/2026 3:16:07 PM



















Req. No. 2516 Page 4